Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2484.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5645YH (2) 91 sc/ns H.F. 2484 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 10A.541 Definitions. 1 For purposes of this part: 2 1. âAgencyâ means a board, commission, committee, or council 3 under the purview of the department. 4 2. âPermitâ means a permit, license, certification, 5 registration, or other form of authorization that a regulated 6 party must obtain from an agency to engage in an activity. 7 3. âPermit transparency portalâ means the online platform 8 established pursuant to section 10A.544 that allows for the 9 tracking of permit applications. 10 4. âProcedural stageâ means a distinct step in the permit 11 process at which an application is transferred or reviewed for 12 approval. 13 5. âProgramâ means the permit transparency program 14 established pursuant to section 10A.542. 15 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 10A.542 Permit transparency program. 16 1. The department shall establish and administer a permit 17 transparency program. 18 2. In administering the permit transparency program, the 19 department shall have all of the following duties: 20 a. Establish standards for permit processing timelines. 21 b. Provide technical assistance to agencies in mapping 22 permit processes. 23 c. Develop standardized metrics for measuring the efficiency 24 of permit processes. 25 d. Recommend statutory or regulatory changes to the governor 26 and general assembly for improving permit approval processes. 27 e. Maintain an inventory of each active permit type issued 28 by an agency. 29 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 10A.543 Permit transparency 30 coordination committee. 31 1. There is established a permit transparency coordination 32 committee within the department composed of representatives 33 from each agency that issues permits. 34 2. The committee shall meet at least quarterly to do all of 35 -1- LSB 5645YH (2) 91 sc/ns 1/ 6 H.F. 2484 the following: 1 a. Share best practices in permit processing. 2 b. Identify opportunities for collaboration between 3 agencies. 4 c. Develop recommendations for improving the stateâs 5 permitting processes. 6 3. The committee shall be chaired by the director. 7 4. The committee is not subject to section 4A.5. 8 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 10A.544 Permit transparency portal. 9 1. The director shall develop and maintain a publicly 10 accessible online permit transparency portal which must include 11 all of the following features: 12 a. A searchable database of each permit type offered by 13 an agency that includes a description of each permit, the 14 legal basis for each permit, application requirements and 15 forms, permit fees, expected processing timelines, and contact 16 information for the person responsible for each step of a 17 permit approval process. 18 b. The ability to submit an application and supporting 19 documentation electronically. 20 c. A tracking system that allows an applicant to monitor the 21 status of the applicantâs applications through each procedural 22 stage. A permit with only a single procedural stage may be 23 excluded from the tracking system. 24 d. Automated notifications of application deadlines. 25 e. The ability to pay an application fee electronically. 26 f. An interactive map showing the geographic distribution of 27 pending and approved applications. 28 g. Historical data on average processing times. 29 2. The permit transparency portal must be designed to do all 30 of the following: 31 a. Integrate with existing agency permitting systems. 32 b. Minimize duplication of data entry. 33 c. Ensure data security and privacy. 34 d. Comply with accessibility standards for persons with 35 -2- LSB 5645YH (2) 91 sc/ns 2/ 6 H.F. 2484 disabilities. 1 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 10A.545 Report. 2 1. The director shall submit to the governor and the general 3 assembly a permitting efficiency report by February 1 of each 4 year that must include all of the following: 5 a. Statistics on the number of permit applications received, 6 approved, and denied by each agency. 7 b. The average processing time for each type of permit. 8 c. The percentage of permits that have not met established 9 timelines and an analysis of the reasons for delay. 10 d. Efficiency metrics. 11 e. Recommendations to improve efficiency. 12 2. The annual report shall be posted on the departmentâs 13 internet site and the permit transparency portal. 14 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 10A.546 Agency responsibilities. 15 Each agency shall do all of the following: 16 1. Designate a liaison to coordinate with the program. 17 2. Integrate agency permit processes with the permit 18 transparency portal. 19 3. Establish a timeline for each procedural stage in the 20 permit approval process. 21 4. Accept electronic submissions of applications and 22 supporting documentation to the extent practicable. 23 5. Within ten business days of receiving an application, 24 the agency shall notify the applicant in writing of whether 25 the application is complete. If the agency determines that 26 an application is incomplete, the notice to the applicant 27 must enumerate each deficiency, citing the applicable rule or 28 statute, and how to remedy the deficiency. 29 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 10A.547 Timeline standards. 30 1. The director shall work with agencies to establish target 31 processing timelines for each type of permit. 32 2. The timeline standards shall be published on the permit 33 transparency portal and included in application materials 34 provided to applicants. 35 -3- LSB 5645YH (2) 91 sc/ns 3/ 6 H.F. 2484 3. The director shall review and, if necessary, revise the 1 timeline standards at least once every five years. 2 Sec. 8. PERMIT AUDIT. 3 1. Within one hundred eighty days of the effective date 4 of this Act, each agency, as defined in section 10A.541, as 5 enacted by this Act, shall conduct an audit of the agencyâs 6 permits and submit the results to the director of the 7 department of inspections, appeals, and licensing. For each 8 type of permit, the audit must include all of the following: 9 a. A description of the permit and the legal basis for the 10 permit. 11 b. The annual number of applications processed for the 12 previous three years. 13 c. The average processing time for each type of permit. 14 d. Any fee associated with the permit. 15 e. A detailed mapping of each procedural stage in the permit 16 approval process. 17 f. Whether applications are accepted electronically. 18 g. Recommendations for eliminating the permit or a 19 procedural stage of the permit approval process. 20 h. Recommendations for an appropriate processing timeline. 21 2. An agency shall, within ninety days of completing the 22 audit, initiate the process to eliminate any permit with five 23 or fewer issuances per year that are not required by statute, 24 unless the director waives the requirement for the permit. 25 3. An agency shall, within ninety days of completing the 26 audit, initiate the process to eliminate or consolidate any 27 permits that serve substantially similar purposes or require 28 substantially similar information and that are not required by 29 statute. 30